Massachusetts, session 194th, H2136.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 9 of chapter 175M of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended in subsection (c) by striking the words, “6 month”, and
inserting in place thereof the following words:- 3 month
SECTION 2. Section 9 of chapter 175M of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended in subsection (c) by striking the words, “6 months”, and inserting in place thereof the
following words:- 3 months
SECTION 3. Section 9 of chapter 175M, as so appearing, is hereby amended in
subsection (c) by striking the word, “presumed”.
SECTION 4. Section 9 of chapter 175M of the General Laws is hereby amended in
subsection (c) by striking the following words, “Such presumption shall be rebutted only by clear
and convincing evidence that such employer's action was not retaliation against the employee
and that the employer had sufficient independent justification for taking such action and would
of 2

have in fact taken such action in the same manner and at the same time the action was taken,
regardless of the employee's use of leave, restoration to a position or participation in proceedings
or inquiries as described in this subsection.”.
of 2